Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-601. Credited service generally.

By rule, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall fix and determine the number of years, and fraction thereof, of service to be credited each member for his or her employment as an employee.

A member shall be employed by an employer covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for a minimum of one hundred sixty (160) days per fiscal year to earn one (1) year of credited service.

Fractional years of service may be granted beginning July 1, 1971, as prescribed by the board.

A member shall not receive more than one (1) year of service in any one (1) fiscal year.

Beginning July 1, 2011, a contributory member who accrues less than one-fourth (¼) year of service credit in a fiscal year may accumulate and carry forward days of service until the first fiscal year in which the contributory member accrues the minimum days of service required to credit one-fourth (¼) year of service credit.

Upon the contributing member's accruing of a minimum of one-fourth (¼) year of service credit, the:

Service credit shall be applied to the latest fiscal year; and

Carry-forward days shall be reset to zero (0).

Days of absence from service because of sickness shall be considered as service if the days are paid sick leave.

Except as provided under subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section, paid or unpaid accrued, unused sick leave shall not be credited as service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If a member dies during active service on or after July 1, 2013, the member's accrued unused sick leave, whether paid or unpaid, shall be credited as service in the fiscal year of the member's death to determine the member's retirement eligibility, final average salary, and eligibility for other system benefits. The member's account shall be credited with:

One (1) day of service for each day of accrued unused sick leave; and

One (1) day of service for any remaining partial day of sick leave.

If a member dies during active service on or after July 1, 2013, the member's unused catastrophic leave and unused donated leave shall not be credited as service.

No credited service may be granted by the board for service rendered before July 1, 1937.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is a reciprocal system under §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405.

In establishing eligibility for a benefit from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the credited service under all reciprocal systems shall be totaled, and the total credited service shall be used in determining eligibility for an Arkansas Teacher Retirement System benefit.

In determining the amount of a benefit from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, there shall be used only the actual service under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and the benefit formula of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The final average salary used shall be that of the reciprocal system that furnishes the highest final average salary at the time of retirement.

Beginning July 1, 2014, if the reciprocal system in which a member has service credit has fewer than the number of years of service credit required in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's formula for the calculation of final average salary for a member, then the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall obtain the salary and service credit information from the reciprocal system and use the combined salary and service credit information to calculate the member's final average salary as if the salary and service credit have all been earned in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

When the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System provides a benefit amount that is not dependent on length of credited service, the benefit amount shall be reduced to the proportion that actual system service bears to total reciprocal system-credited service.

In any case of question as to the service credit of any person, the board shall have the final power to decide the question.

Beginning July 1, 2013, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall allow a member who earns concurrent service in both the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and a reciprocal system to receive full service credit in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System without reduction of service credit due to the concurrent service.

Credited service in an alternate retirement plan or the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is not allowed under subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall not recognize any concurrent service added to the member's credited service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System that credits a member with more than one (1) year of credited service for a fiscal year or combines salary earned in both systems in a fiscal year for the purpose of:

Vesting;

Retirement eligibility; and

Calculating final average salary.

A member may elect to waive all or part of the concurrent service credited to the member in the system and retire under a reciprocal system if:

The member acknowledges that the waiver is a voluntary surrender of the member's concurrent service credit in the system and cancels the member's concurrent service credit in the system; and

The member's employer-accrued contributions and employee-accrued contributions in the system remain with the system.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 5; 1979, No. 681, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 4, 5; 1983, No. 665, §§ 4, 5; 1985, No. 805, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1440; Acts 1989, No. 10, § 2; 1989, No. 653, § 3; 1991, No. 43, § 4; 2007, No. 97, § 8; 2011, No. 974, § 3; 2013, No. 555, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 200, §
1; 2017, No. 265, § 2; 2017, No. 612, § 1; 2019, No. 427, § 9; 2019, No. 595, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 652, § 6, provided:

“In no case shall fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days of teaching service rendered in any fiscal school year be credited as one (1) year of service, nor shall more than (1) year of service be credited any member for all teaching service rendered by him in any one (1) fiscal school year, nor shall any credited service be given for service as a consultant.”

Acts 1989, No. 653, § 3, provided:

“In no case shall fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days of service rendered in any fiscal school year be credited as one (1) year of service, nor shall more than one (1) year of service be credited any member for all service rendered by him in any one (1) fiscal school year, nor shall any credited service be given for service as a consultant.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (b) and inserted (b)(1) through (4).

The 2013 amendment inserted (e)(5) and redesignated former (e)(5) as (e)(6); and added (g).

The 2017 amendment by No. 200 redesignated former (c)(2) as (c)(2)(A); added “Except as provided under subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section” at the beginning of (c)(2)(A); and added (c)(2)(B) and (C).

The 2017 amendment by No. 265 substituted “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “system” references in (e) and (g) and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment by No. 612 added (g)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 427 substituted “paid or unpaid accrued, unused sick leave shall not be credited as service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “days of paid sick leave shall not be considered service if the payment is for unused sick leave” in (c)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 595, in (e)(4), substituted the first occurrence of “salary” for “compensation” and inserted the second occurrence of “average”.

Cross References.

Leaves of absence, § 6-17-306.

24-7-602. Military service credit.

If an active member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System enters the United States Armed Forces during a period that a federal military draft was in effect and obtains a refund of member contributions from the system, the compulsory military service required of the member may be established as free credited service under this subchapter, if after an honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces and before retirement the member repays to the system the actuarial equivalent of the member's refunded service.

In addition, an active member who entered the United States Armed Forces during any period that a federal military draft was in effect and who becomes an active member after an honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces is eligible to receive free military service credit under this section, whether or not the member has five (5) or more years of credited service at the time of the reemployment.

When a member who is first employed after serving in the United States Armed Forces during a period of time that the military draft was in effect, he or she is eligible to receive free military service credit under this section if the member:

Completes five (5) or more years of actual service in the system; and

Receives an honorable discharge.

All United States Armed Forces service not otherwise creditable under this section shall be creditable, provided the member pays to the system the actuarial equivalent for the service credit.

Effective December 12, 1994, a member who leaves employment with a school to serve, on a voluntary or involuntary basis, in the uniformed services of the United States and returns to employment with a school shall be treated as not having incurred a break in service with the employer. The employer shall certify to the system that reemployment was in accordance with the requirements set forth in section 4312 of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, Pub. L. No. 103-353.

Under this subsection, “uniformed services of the United States” is limited to the United States Armed Forces; the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard when engaged in active duty for training, state active duty, inactive duty training, or full-time National Guard duty; the United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service; and any other category of persons designated by the President of the United States in time of war or emergency.

The cumulative length of the absence from a position of employment with the employer by reason of service in the uniformed services shall not exceed five (5) years.

A member reemployed under this subsection shall be entitled to accrue benefits for the time he or she served in the uniformed services by paying the employee contributions set forth in § 24-7-406.

An employer reemploying a member under this subsection shall pay to the system the employer contributions due for the time the member served in the uniformed services and shall be those required by § 24-3-103 [repealed]. However, should a member not pay the employee contributions due, then no employer contributions shall be due.

For the purposes of determining the employee and employer contributions due, the member's compensation during the period of service in the uniformed services shall be computed at:

The rate the member would have received had he or she not served in the uniformed services; or

The member's average compensation level during the twelve-month period, or shorter, if applicable, immediately preceding the service.

If both employee and employer contributions are not paid, the member shall not be entitled to any accrued benefits for the time served in the uniformed services.

In no event shall a person be credited with a total of more than five (5) years of armed service, except that service credited under subsection (c) of this section shall be in addition to that amount.

In any case of doubt as to the period of the armed service to be credited a member, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall have the power to determine the period.

In the case of a death occurring on or after January 1, 2007, if a member dies while performing qualified military service as defined in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414(u)(5), as it existed on January 1, 2011, the survivors of the member are entitled to any additional benefits, including determining a member's vesting, provided under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as if the member had resumed and then terminated employment on account of death.

Additional benefits under subdivision (f)(1) of this section do not include benefit accruals relating to the period of qualified military service.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 5; 1979, No. 681, § 1; 1983, No. 619, § 5; 1983, No. 665, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1440; Acts 1987, No. 518, § 1; 1989, No. 652, § 7; 1989, No. 653, § 4; 1991, No. 43, § 5; 1997, No. 142, § 2; 1997, No. 739, § 1; 1997, No. 1053, § 1; 1997, No. 1068, § 1; 2009, No. 468, § 10; 2011, No. 45, § 4; 2011, No. 69, §§ 14, 15; 2013, No. 140, § 4; 2015, No. 301, § 7; 2015, No. 558, § 1; 2019, No. 474, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §
1-2-207(b), subsection (b) is set out above as amended by Acts 2015, No. 558, § 1. Subsection (b) was also amended by Acts 2015, No. 301, § 7, to read as follows:

“(b)

An active or inactive member who entered the armed forces shall have the period of armed forces service credited as service in the system without cost to the member if the member completes five (5) or more years of actual service in the system.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted former (b); redesignated former (c) as present (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and rewrote (a) and present (b).

The 2011 amendment by No. 45 added (g).

The 2011 amendment by No. 69 substituted “actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits” for “amount, if any, the member was refunded at the time of termination together with interest from the date of the refund to the date of repayment” in (a)(1); and
substituted “to the system the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits” for “both the employee and employer contributions required by the system, plus interest from the date of discharge from active duty until paid in full” in (c).

The 2013 amendment inserted “active or” in the introductory language of (b).

The 2015 amendment by No. 301 rewrote (b) [now (a)(3)].

The 2015 amendment by No. 558, in (a)(1), substituted “a period that a federal military draft was in effect and obtains” for “any period of compulsory military service, after receiving,” inserted “free” preceding “credited service,” inserted “an honorable” preceding “discharge,” and substituted “refunded service” for “benefits” at the end; in (a)(2), substituted “period that a federal military draft was in effect” for “period of compulsory military service,” substituted “after an honorable discharge” for “within one (1) year of his or her discharge,” and inserted “free”; rewrote and redesignated former (b) as (a)(3); redesignated former (c) through (g) as (b) through (f); in present (b), substituted “All United States Armed Forces service” for “If mandated by federal law before December 12, 1994, armed service” and substituted “for the service credit” for “of the member’s benefits”; and updated internal references.

The 2019 amendment, in (c)(2), inserted “state active duty” and substituted “United States Commissioned Corps” for “commissioned corps”.

24-7-603. Out-of-state service — Definition.

As used in this section, “out-of-state service” means service rendered in any state except Arkansas in a position that would have been covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System had the service been actual service covered by the system if rendered in the state.

Out-of-state service purchased before July 1, 1987, shall be credited as service under this section in accordance with provisions in force before July 1, 1987.

From and after July 1, 1987, an active member shall be eligible to establish out-of-state service to be credited as service under this subchapter under the following conditions:

The out-of-state service credit to be granted shall be limited to service for which no benefit could be paid by another system similar in purpose to this system, except Social Security, if the member had left on deposit his or her contributions to the other system.

The credit under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section is limited to fifteen (15) years;

The member shall pay to the system for each year of service credit granted the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits.

The payment shall be credited to the member's account in the members' deposit account and shall be in addition to regular member contributions thereto;

The out-of-state service shall not become credited service under this system until the member has established five (5) or more years of actual service.

If a member ceases to be an active member before the out-of-state service has been established as system-credited service, the member payments made under this section shall be refundable;

The benefit program to be applied to each year of service credit being granted shall be the benefit program in effect at the time of retirement; and

Such other rules consistent with this subchapter as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may from time to time adopt.

An active member may purchase a fraction of a year of out-of-state service to be credited as service under this subchapter in the same manner as provided for out-of-state service under subsection (c) of this section if the service meets the following requirements:

The member has not less than one-fourth (¼) year of out-of-state credited service in the fiscal year; and

The fraction of a year of out-of-state service may be credited in keeping with policies of the board under § 24-7-601.

An active member shall be eligible, upon application, to purchase service rendered outside the state during a period of employment with an education coordinating council to be credited as out-of-state service under the provisions of this section, provided that the conditions of subsection (c) of this section are met.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 5; 1979, No. 681, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 4, 5; 1983, No. 665, §§ 4, 5; 1985, No. 805, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1440; Acts 1987, No. 118, § 1; 1989, No. 10, § 1; 1991, No. 501, § 1; 1995, No. 524, § 1; 1997, No. 142, §§ 3, 4; 1997, No. 1053, § 2; 1999, No. 110, § 1; 1999, No. 866, §§ 2, 3; 2003, No. 1473, § 57; 2005, No. 385, § 3; 2009, No. 468, § 11; 2011, No. 69, § 16; 2011, No. 974, § 4;
2019, No. 315, § 2887.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, the 1991 amendment adding (e) began “From and after July 1, 1991….”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “actual service covered by the system if rendered in the state” for “rendered in the State of Arkansas” in (a); in (c), deleted “upon application” following “shall be eligible” in the introductory language, subdivided (c)(1), and inserted “under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section” in (c)(1)(B); deleted “together with regular interest thereon” followng “refundable” in (c)(3)(B)(ii); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment by No. 69, in the introductory language of (c), substituted “establish” for “purchase” and “under” for “in accordance with”; and rewrote (c)(2) and (c)(3).

The 2011 amendment by No. 974 substituted “one-fourth (¼) year” for “thirty (30) days” in (d)(1); and substituted “under” for “as provided by” in (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c)(5).

24-7-604. Overseas service.

As used in this section, “overseas service” means service in an American-type overseas school sponsored and approved by either the United States Department of State or the United States Department of Defense, or service rendered in the Peace Corps or AmeriCorps VISTA, Volunteers in Service to America.

A member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may receive membership service credit for service in an overseas school subject to the following conditions:

To be eligible for overseas service credit, a member must have a minimum of five (5) years of membership service in a position covered by the system;

The overseas service credit to be granted shall be limited to service for which no benefit could be paid by another system similar in purpose to this system, except Social Security.

The maximum overseas service credited to any member shall be ten (10) years;

To be eligible for a year of overseas service credit, a member must have rendered the minimum days of service required for a fiscal year of service credit under § 24-7-601.

Fractions of years of service may be credited in keeping with policies of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as provided by § 24-7-601;

Overseas service credit may be established by paying to the system the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits.

The employer's cost-of-service credit may be paid either by the employer or by the member.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 5; 1979, No. 681, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 4, 5; 1983, No. 665, §§ 4, 5; 1985, No. 805, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1440; Acts 1987, No. 4, § 2; 1989, No. 670, § 1; 1991, No. 43, § 6; 1997, No. 142, § 5; 1997, No. 1053, § 3; 1999, No. 866, § 4; 2011, No. 69, § 17; 2011, No. 974, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, subdivision (b)(3) is set out above as amended by Acts 2011, No. 974.
As amended by Acts 2011, No. 69, subdivision (b)(3) read as follows:

“(3)

To be eligible for a year of overseas service credit, a member must have rendered at least one hundred sixty (160) days of service. Fractions of years of service may be credited in keeping with policies of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as provided by § 24-7-601;”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by No. 974, subdivided (3); and substituted “the minimum days of service required for a fiscal year of service credit under § 24-7-601” for “at least one hundred twenty (120) days” in (b)(3)(A).

24-7-605. Service in General Assembly.

Any member of the Senate or House of Representatives of the General Assembly who is a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be eligible, upon application, to receive credited service and salary in the system for his or her full contract salary in the event that a cut in pay is required by the school district during his or her attendance at regular or extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly or during his or her attendance at meetings of regular or special committees of the General Assembly during the interim.

These meetings shall include, but not be limited to, the Legislative Council, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the interim committees, and special legislative committees.

The member shall receive credited service and salary upon payment by him or her of the necessary member contribution and upon appropriation from the Public School Fund of the necessary employer contribution for the amount of the salary reduction during periods of attending regular or extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly or sessions of legislative committees.

The amount of credited salary shall not exceed the contract salary of the member for the school year contract period.

Any member of the House of Representatives or the Senate currently serving in the General Assembly or the legislative committees for any year prior to July 6, 1977, not to exceed five (5) years, may make application for and receive credited service and salary in the system for his or her full contract salary as an employee with respect to any reduction therein during attendance at regular or extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly or sessions of legislative committees in which he or she served.

This shall be done only if he or she pays to the system the member contribution required by law, and if appropriation is made from the Public School Fund for the necessary employer contribution required by law for that portion of his or her contract salary for any period for which he or she suffered a reduction in pay during legislative service.

Any member of the Senate or House of Representatives of the General Assembly who is an employee and is a member of the system shall be eligible, upon application, to receive credited service and salary in the system for his or her full contract salary in the event that either the member or the school district decides it is in the best interest of the school district for the member to take a leave of absence for up to one (1) full calendar year at a time to attend to his or her duties as a General Assembly member.

Service and salary shall be credited upon payment by the member of the necessary member contribution and the necessary employer contribution for the amount of the member's contract salary during periods of attending regular or extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly or sessions of legislative committees.

The amount of credited salary shall not exceed the member's contract salary for the school year contract period.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 351, § 1; 1979, No. 121, § 1; 1979, No. 313, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-1440.1, 80-1440.2; Acts 1989, No. 653, § 5; 1997, No. 1354, § 41; 2019, No. 427, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “and salary” throughout the section; and substituted “credited salary” for “credited service” in (a)(2) and (b)(3).

24-7-606. Service for leave of absence to obtain advanced degree.

From and after June 28, 1985, any public school teacher or administrator who is a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and takes a leave of absence from a school in order to obtain an advanced degree at an institution of higher learning or to fulfill the requirements of a scholarship or grant shall be eligible, upon application, to receive credited service in the system for the time of actual enrollment in the institution.

Evidence of the minimum days of enrollment at an institution of higher education in a fiscal year equivalent to the minimum days of service required for a fiscal year of service credit under § 24-7-601 shall be presented with the application.

The service shall be credited in accordance with § 24-7-601.

The member shall pay the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system for each year of service credit being granted.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 897, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1440.4; Acts 1989, No. 652, § 8; 1991, No. 184, § 1; 1995, No. 542, § 5; 1997, No. 142, § 6; 1999, No. 866, § 5; 2003, No. 1473, § 58; 2011, No. 69, § 18; 2011, No. 974, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Subsection (d) was omitted from this section as set out in Acts 1997, No. 142, but was not specifically deleted by the act. This may have been an engrossing error. Subsection (d) of this section read as follows:

“(d)

The payment shall be credited to the member's account in the members' deposit account but shall be in addition to regular member contributions to the account.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by No. 69 inserted “the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits” in present (c), and deleted (c)(1) and (c)(2).

The 2011 amendment by No. 974 rewrote (a)(2).

24-7-607. Private school service — Definition.

As used in this section, “private school service” means service rendered in a private school or agency that would have been covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System if the service had been:

Rendered in a public school; and

The private school or agency:

Has positions that would require the issuance of a teaching license in a public school based upon a determination by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; or

Is recognized as a private educationally related entity by resolution adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Private educationally related entity service purchased for employment at a private educationally related entity to obtain system-credited service is limited to five (5) years or less.

An active member purchasing certified private school service shall be eligible, upon application, to purchase private school service for a period not to exceed fifteen (15) years, to be credited as certified service under this subchapter under the following conditions:

The private school service credit to be purchased shall be limited to service for which no benefit could be paid by another system similar in purpose to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, except Social Security, if the member left on deposit his or her contributions to the other system;

The member shall pay the actuarial equivalent of benefits as set forth under § 24-7-202 to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for each year of private school service credit being purchased.

The payment shall be credited to the member's account in the members' deposit account and shall be in addition to regular member contributions thereto;

The private school service shall not become credited service under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System until:

The member payment under this section has been paid in full; and

The member has established five (5) or more years of actual service, exclusive of private school service.

If a member ceases to be an active member before the private school service has been established as system-credited service, the member payments contributed under this section shall be refunded to the member;

The benefit program to be applied to each year of private school service credit and private educationally related entity service credit being purchased shall be the benefit program in effect at the time of retirement; and

Such other rules consistent with this subchapter as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may from time to time adopt.

An active member is eligible to purchase noncertified private school service or private educationally related entity private school service for a period of five (5) years or less that will be credited as noncertified service under this subchapter when:

The member properly submits an application to purchase noncertified private school service or private educationally related entity private school service;

The noncertified service credit to be purchased is limited to service for which no benefit could be paid by another state-supported pension system or a system with a similar purpose when the contributions of the member were left on deposit with the other system; and

The member pays the actuarial equivalent of benefits as set forth under § 24-7-202 to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for each year of service credit being purchased.

The payment shall be credited to the member's account in the members' deposit account and shall be in addition to regular member contributions thereto.

The noncertified service shall not become credited service under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System until:

The member payment under this section has been paid in full; and

The member has established five (5) or more years of actual service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If a member ceases to be an active member before the noncertified service has been established as system-credited service, the member payments contributed under this section shall be refunded to the member upon request.

The benefit program applied to each year of private school service or private educationally related entity private school service credit being purchased shall be the benefit program in effect at the time of retirement.

The purchase and application of the noncertified service credit shall be subject to the rules consistent with this subchapter as the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may from time to time adopt.

An active member may purchase a fraction of a year of private school service to be credited as service under this subchapter in the same manner as provided for private school service under subsection (b) of this section if the service meets the following requirements:

The member has not less than one-fourth (¼) of a year of private school service in a fiscal year under § 24-7-601; and

The fraction of a year of private school service may be credited in keeping with policies as provided by § 24-7-601.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 388, § 1; 1995, No. 513, § 1; 1995, No. 524, § 2; 1997, No. 142, § 7; 1997, No. 1053, § 4; 1999, No. 110, § 2; 1999, No. 866, § 6; 2001, No. 1534, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 59; 2005, No. 385, § 4; 2007, No. 97, § 9; 2009, No. 468, § 12; 2011, No. 69, § 19; 2011, No. 974, § 7; 2013, No. 223, § 1; 2015, No. 90, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2888, 2889.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “together with regular interest thereon” following “refundable” in (b)(3)(B)(ii).

The 2011 amendment by No. 69 inserted “for a period not to exceed fifteen (15) years” in the introductory language of (b); deleted “and it shall be limited to fifteen (15) years” at the end of (b)(1); inserted “the actuarial equivalent of benefits as set forth under § 24-7-202” in (b)(2)(A); deleted (b)(2)(A)(i) and (ii); deleted former (b)(2)(B) and redesignated former (b)(2)(C) as present (b)(2)(B); substituted “under this section” for “specified in subdivision (b)(2) of this section” in (b)(3)(A) and (B)(ii); and substituted “refunded to the member” for “refundable” in (b)(3)(B)(ii),

The 2011 amendment by No. 974, in (c)(1), substituted “one-fourth (¼) year” for “thirty (30) days” and inserted “under § 24-7-601”.

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (a) as introductory language of (a)(1) and (a)(2)(A); inserted (a)(1) and introductory language of (a)(2); substituted “would have been covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System if the service had been” for “is recognized” in the introductory language of (a); inserted “Has positions recognized” in (a)(2)(A); and added (a)(2)(B).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(2)(A); inserted “entity” preceding “service” in (a)(2)(B)(ii); in the introductory language of (b), deleted “From and after January 1, 1990” from the beginning, inserted “purchasing certified private school service,” and inserted “certified” preceding “service under”; substituted “purchased” for “granted” in (b)(1); in (b)(2)(A), substituted “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “system” and substituted “private school service credit being purchased” for “service credit being granted”; substituted “private school service credit and private educationally related entity service credit being purchased” for “service credit being granted” in (b)(4); and inserted present (c) and redesignated former (c) as (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(5) and (c)(4).

24-7-608. Limitation on benefit enhancement.

A benefit enhancement provided for by this act shall not be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed an eighteen-year amortization.

A benefit enhancement provided for by this act shall not be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding eighteen (18) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 27; 2019, No. 427, § 11.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-7-601 — 24-7-607 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-7-101 — 24-7-206, 24-7-209 — 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-607, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-720, 24-7-723, 24-7-801, 24-7-803 — 24-7-901, 24-7-903 — 24-7-1312, and 24-7-1314 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “A benefit enhancement provided for by this act shall not be implemented” for “No benefit enhancement provided for by this act shall be implemented” in (a) and (b); substituted “an eighteen-year amortization” for “a thirty-year amortization” in (a); and substituted “eighteen (18) years” for “thirty (30) years” in (b).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1997, No. 1053, codified as §§ 24-2-502, 24-3-201 [repealed], 24-3-206 — 24-3-208 [repealed], 24-5-107, 24-5-110, 24-5-112 — 24-5-114, 24-5-118, 24-6-211 — 24-6-214, 24-7-602 — 24-7-604, 24-7-607, 24-7-608, 24-7-701, 24-7-704, 24-7-705, 24-7-707, 24-7-710, 24-7-807, 24-7-1005 [repealed].

24-7-609. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section, concerning limitation on benefit enhancement of Acts 1997, No. 1053, was repealed pursuant to Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 15. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 27. For present law, see § 24-7-608.

24-7-610. Credit for service in National Guard and armed forces reserve — Definition.

As used in this section, “armed forces reserve” means one (1) of the reserve components of the United States Armed Forces.

A member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be entitled to purchase credited service in the system for a period not to exceed five (5) years for service rendered by the member in the National Guard or the armed forces reserve if the member:

Makes an application to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

Provides proof satisfactory to the board of that person's service in the National Guard or the armed forces reserve; and

Pays to the system for each year of service credit being granted the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits.

The payment shall be credited to the member's account in the members' deposit account and shall be in addition to regular member contributions.

A member may, one (1) time each fiscal year, purchase up to one (1) year of service credit for each one (1) year of service in the National Guard or armed forces reserve.

The National Guard or armed forces reserve service shall not become credited service under this system until:

The member payments specified in subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section have been paid in full; and

The member has established five (5) or more years of actual service in the system.

If a member ceases to be an active member before the service in the National Guard or the armed forces reserve has been established as system-credited service, the member payments contributed as specified in subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section shall be refundable.

This section is supplemental to § 24-7-602, and this section does not diminish the right of any member of the system to obtain credited service in the system for active duty military service within the limits permitted by § 24-7-602.

However, a member shall not be entitled to or receive in excess of five (5) years of credited service rendered by the member under this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1296, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 60; 2009, No. 468, § 13; 2011, No. 66, § 1; 2011, No. 69, § 20; 2019, No. 427, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “together with regular interest thereon” following “refundable” in (d).

The 2011 amendment by Act No. 66 rewrote the section heading; added present (a) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “National Guard or the armed forces reserve” for “Arkansas National Guard” throughout the section; rewrote present (c); substituted “(b)(1)(C)” for “(a)(1)(C)” in (d)(1) and (e); inserted “service in the” in (e); and deleted former (f).

The 2011 amendment by No. 69 added “the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits” to the end of (a)(1)(C); deleted (a)(1)(C)(i) and (ii); deleted former (a)(2); and redesignated former (a)(3) as present (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (c).